Wyoming, session 2026, SF0038.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 11-37-107 by creating a new
subsection (d) is amended to read:

11-37-107. Creation of account; collection of
additional brand inspection fee; administration fees;
disposition of proceeds.

SF0038

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0330
(d) The state is authorized to assess an additional
management fee for services provided directly to the
council that are in addition to the services provided by
the board under subsection (c) of this section in an amount
not to exceed three percent (3%) of the annual portion of
the fees collected by the council that are not otherwise
obligated or encumbered under this act and where the
expenditure is at the discretion of the council.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0038